District of Columbia statutes.
7-875.06

Applicability.

This chapter shall apply to all individual and group health benefit plans issued or renewed 120 days after the issuance of rules required under § 7-875.05.

Apr. 13, 2005, D.C. Law 15-353, § 307, 52 DCR 2331
For temporary (225 day) addition, see § 308 of the Child and Youth, Safety and Health Omnibus Second Temporary Amendment Act of 2004 (D.C. Law 15-319, April 8, 2005, law notification 52 DCR 4708).
For temporary (90 day) uniform child health screening requirements, see § 306 of Child and Youth, Safety and Health Omnibus Emergency Amendment Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-630, November 30, 2004, 52 DCR 1143).
For temporary (90 day) uniform child health screening requirements, see § 307 of Child and Youth, Safety and Health Omnibus Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2005 (D.C. Act 16-30, February 17, 2005, 52 DCR 2993).